el: Χρώμα περιτυλίγματος πούρου: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Άλλο
cs: Barva obalu doutníku: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Jiné
de: Farbe des Zigarrendeckblatts: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Sonstige
ja: 葉巻の包装紙の色: カンデラ; クラロ; クラロマデューロ; コロラド; コロラドクラロ; コロラドマデューロ; ダブルマデューロ; マデューロ; オスクロ; その他
fi: Sikarin päällyslehden väri: Candela; Claro; Claro maduro; Colorado; Colorado claro; Colorado maduro; Double maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Muu
nl: Sigaar dekbladkleur: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Anders
bg-BG: Цвят на обвивката на пурата: Кандела; Кларо; Кларо мадуро; Колорадо; Колорадо кларо; Колорадо мадуро; Дабъл мадуро; Мадуро; Оскуро; Друго
ko: 시가 겉잎 색상: 칸델라; 클라로; 클라로 마두로; 콜로라도; 콜로라도 클라로; 콜로라도 마두로; 더블 마두로; 마두로; 오스쿠로; 기타
hr-HR: Boja omota za cigare: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Ostalo
en: Cigar wrapper color: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Other
pt-BR: Cor do invólucro do charuto: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Duplo Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Outro
it: fascia di sigaro colorata: Candela; Claro; Claro maduro; Colorado; Colorado claro; Colorado maduro; Double maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Altro
es: Color de la capa del cigarro: Candela; Claro; Claro maduro; Colorado; Colorado claro; Colorado maduro; Doble maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Otro
sl-SI: Barva ovoja za cigare: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Drugo
lt-LT: Cigarų apvalkalo spalva: „Candela“; „Claro“; „Claro Maduro“; „Colorado“; „Colorado Claro“; „Colorado Maduro“; „Double Maduro“; „Maduro“; „Oscuro“; Kita
zh-CN: 雪茄茄衣颜色: 坎德拉; 克拉罗; 克拉罗·马杜罗; 科罗拉多; 科罗拉多·克拉罗; 科罗拉多·马杜罗; 双倍马杜罗; 马杜罗; 奥斯库罗; 其他
sv: Cigarrhöljets färg: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Annan
tr: Puro sarma yaprağı rengi: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Diğer
fr: Couleur de la cape du cigare: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Autre
hu: Szivarborító színe: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Egyéb
th: สีของใบห่อซิการ์: แคนเดลา; คลาโร; คลาโรมาดูโร; โคโลราโด; โคโลราโดคลาโร; โคโลราโดมาดูโร; ดับเบิลมาดูโร; มาดูโร; ออสคูโร; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 雪茄茄衣顏色: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; 其他
vi: Màu lá bọc xì gà: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Khác
pl: Kolor pokrywy cygara: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Inny
ro-RO: Culoare învelitoare de trabuc: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Altele
sk-SK: Farba obalu na cigary: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Iné
ru: Цвет покровного листа сигары: Кандела; Кларо; Кларо Мадуро; Колорадо; Колорадо Кларо; Колорадо Мадуро; Дабл Мадуро; Мадуро; Оскуро; Другой
nb: Fargede sigarpapir: Candela; Claro; Claro maduro; Colorado; Colorado claro; Colorado maduro; Dobbel maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Annen
pt-PT: Cor do invólucro do charuto: Candela; Claro; Claro maduro; Colorado; Colorado claro; Colorado maduro; Maduro duplo; Maduro; Oscuro; Outro
da: Farve på cigaromslag: Candela; Claro; Claro Maduro; Colorado; Colorado Claro; Colorado Maduro; Double Maduro; Maduro; Oscuro; Andet